District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Peace DC Omnibus Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 1101 of Title 6A of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations (6A
DCMR § 1101), is amended as follows:
(a) The section heading is amended by striking the phrase “SECTION 4-114" and
inserting the phrase “SECTION 5-129.02” in its place.
(b) Subsection 1101.1 is repealed.
(c) Strike the phrase “Code §4-114 (1981)” wherever it appears and insert the phrase
“Code § 5-129.02” in its place.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 3. Section 202(e)(1) of the Omnibus Police Reform Amendment Act of 2000,
effective October 4, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-160; D.C. Official Code § 5-107.01(e)(1)), is amended
to read as follows:
“(1) Successfully completed 60 hours of post-secondary education at an
accredited college or university; except that, if the Metropolitan Police Department enters into an
agreement with an accredited college or university to award credit hours to recruits successfully
completing the Department’s initial training program for recruits, an applicant may satisfy up to
20 credits of the 60-credit hour requirement by earning credits through the initial training
program for recruits;”.
Sec. 4. Section 12(k)(1A) of The Policemen and Firemen’s Retirement and Disability
Act, approved September 1, 1916 (39 Stat. 718; D.C. Official Code § 5-716(a-1)), is amended to
read as follows:
(a) The existing text is designated as subparagraph (A).
(b) A new subparagraph (B) is added to read as follows:
“(B)(i) A current member who dies of an injury or illness covered by
sections 652(a), 653(a), or 654(a) of the Fire and Police Medical Leave and Limited Duty
Amendment Act of 2004, effective May 1, 2013 (D.C. Law 19-311; D.C. Official Code §§ 5-
652(a), 5-653(a), or 5-654(a)), shall be deemed to have died in the performance of duty for the
purposes of this section.
“(ii) A retired member who dies within 5 years of retirement of an
injury or illness previously ruled to be a performance of duty injury or illness covered by
sections 652(a), 653(a), or 654(a) of the Fire and Police Medical Leave and Limited Duty
Amendment Act of 2004, effective May 1, 2013 (D.C. Law 19-311; D.C. Official Code §§ 5-
652(a), 5-653(a), or 5-654(a)), shall be deemed to have died in the performance of duty for the
purposes of this section.”.
Sec. 5. Section 23-581(a) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Paragraph (2) is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (C) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “Theft of property valued less than $250” and insert
the phrase “Theft of property that has some value” in its place.
(B) Strike the phrase “section 111 [D.C. Official Code, § 22-3211]” and
insert the phrase “section 112 [D.C. Official Code § 22-3212(b)]” in its place.
(2) Subparagraph (D) is amended as follows:
(A) Strike the phrase “Theft of property valued in excess of $250” and
insert the phrase “Theft of property valued at $1,000 or more; Theft twice or more in a 6-month
period with an aggregate value of $1,000 or more” in its place.
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(B) Strike the phrase “section 111 [D.C. Official Code, § 22-3211]” and
insert the phrase “section 112(a) [D.C. Official Code § 22-3212(a)]” in its place.
(3) Subparagraph (E) is amended by striking the phrase “Unauthorized Disposal
of Solid Waste” and inserting the phrase “Unauthorized disposal of solid waste, hazardous waste,
or medical waste” in its place.
(b) Paragraph (3) is amended as follows:
(1) Strike the phrase “section 9(b-1) (D.C. Official Code § 50-2201.04(b-1))” and
insert the phrase “section 9(c) (D.C. Official Code § 50-2201.04(c))” in its place.
(2) Strike the phrase “section 10(b) (D.C. Official Code § 50-2201.05(b))
[Repealed]” and insert the phrase “section 3(b) (D.C. Official Code § 50-2206.11)” in its place.
(3) Strike the phrase “Operating or physically controlling a vehicle when under
the influence of intoxicating liquor or drugs, when operating ability is impaired by intoxicating
liquor, or when the operator’s blood, breath, or urine contains the amount of alcohol which is
prohibited by section 10(b)” and insert the phrase “Driving under the influence (DUI) of alcohol
or a drug” in its place.
(4) Strike the phrase “section 13(e) (D.C. Official Code § 50-1403.01(e)” and
insert the phrase “section 13(f) (D.C. Official Code § 50-1403.01(f))” in its place.
Sec. 6. Section 5 of the Act to Regulate Public Conduct on Public Passenger Vehicles,
effective September 23, 1975 (D.C. Law 1-18; D.C. Official Code § 35-254), is amended as
follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “of this section” and inserting
the phrase “and (1A) of this section” in its place.
(2) Paragraph (2)(A) is amended to read as follows:
“(2)(A) Violations penalized under this subsection shall be adjudicated by the
Office of Administrative Hearings in accordance with the Department of Consumer and
Regulatory Affairs Civil Infractions Act of 1985, effective October 5, 1985 (D.C. Law 6-42;
D.C. Official Code § 2-1801.01 et seq.).”.
(b) Subsection (b)(1A) is amended by striking the phrase “authorized individual” and
inserting the phrase “authorized individual under subsection (a)(3) of this section” in its place.
Sec. 7. Chapter 8 of Title 16 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Section 16-805(c)(1) is amended as follows:
(1) Subparagraph (A) is amended by striking the phrase “prior to the effective
date of the Second Chance Amendment Act of 2022, passed on 2nd reading on December 20,
2022 (Enrolled version of Bill 24-63)” and inserting the phrase “on or before September 30,
2027” in its place.
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(2) Subparagraph (B) is amended by striking the phrase “the effective date of the
Second Chance Amendment Act of 2022, on 2nd reading on December 20, 2022 (Enrolled
version of Bill 24-63), shall be sealed” and inserting the phrase “October 1, 2027, shall be sealed
by October 1, 2027, or” in its place.
(b) Section 16-806 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (a)(1)(B) is amended to read as follows:
“(B)(i) The offense is not an offense listed in § 16-805(b) and the person
cited, arrested, or charged files a written motion prior to October 1, 2027; or
(ii) The offense is an offense listed in § 16-805(b); and”.
(2) Subsection (i) is amended by adding a new paragraph (7) to read as follows:
“(7) Notwithstanding paragraph (6) of this subsection, the dismissal of a motion
under this section between March 1, 2025, and the effective date of the Peace DC Omnibus
Amendment Act of 2025, passed on 2nd reading on July 1, 2025 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-
187), shall not preclude a movant from filing and the Court from entertaining subsequent
motions sooner than one year after the date on which the initial motion was resolved.”.
Sec. 8. The Secure DC Omnibus Amendment Act of 2024, effective June 8, 2024 (D.C.
Law 25-175; 71 DCR 2732), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 18(c)(2) is amended to read as follows:
“(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection shall expire December 31, 2026.”.
(b) Section 30 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (f)(1)(H) is amended to read as follows:
“(H) A new paragraph (9) is added to read as follows:
““(9) Committed a crime of violence, as that term is defined in § 23-1331(4);
except, that robbery where the victim does not sustain a physical injury and burglary in the
second degree shall not be subject to the rebuttable presumption of detention under this
subsection.”.”.
(2) Subsection (k) is amended to read as follows:
“(k) Subsections (f), (g), and (h) of this section shall expire December 31, 2026.”.
Sec. 9. Section 1505 of the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council for the District of
Columbia Establishment Act of 2001, effective October 3, 2001 (D.C. Law 14-28; D.C. Official
Code § 22-4234), is amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (b-9) is amended by striking the phrase “May 7, 2025” and inserting the
phrase “September 30, 2026” in its place.
(b) Subsection (b-10) is amended by striking the phrase “May 7, 2025” and inserting the
phrase “September 30, 2026” in its place.
Sec. 10. Applicability.
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a)(1) Upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial
plan, section 4 shall retroactively apply as of January 1, 2024
(2) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal
effect in an approved budget and financial plan and provide notice to the Budget Director of the
Council of the certification.
(3)(A) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be
published in the District of Columbia Register.
(B) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect
the applicability of the provision identified in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(b) Section 7 shall apply as of March 1, 2025.
Sec. 11. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 12. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 60-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(2) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(2)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
5